Hawaii statutes.
§560:3-1203 Small estates; summary
administration procedure. If it appears from the inventory and appraisal
that the value of the entire estate, less liens and encumbrances, does not
exceed homestead allowance, exempt property, family allowance, costs and
expenses of administration, reasonable funeral expenses, and reasonable and
necessary medical and hospital expenses of the last illness of the decedent,
the personal representative, without giving notice to creditors, may
immediately disburse and distribute the estate to the persons entitled thereto
and file a closing statement as provided in section 560:3-1204. [L 1996, c 288,
pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next